Idaho statutes. Title 61 PUBLIC UTILITY REGULATION
Chapter 4
REPORTS BY PUBLIC UTILITIES

Sec.

§ 61-401. Information to be furnished.

Every public utility shall furnish to the commission, in such form and such detail as the commission shall prescribe, all tabulations, computations and all other information required by it to carry into effect any of the provisions of this act and shall make answers to the best of their knowledge, to all questions submitted by the commission.

§ 61-402. Inventory of physical properties.

Every public utility, except railroad corporations, shall file with the commission an inventory of all its physical properties within the state, designating the exact location of its property within the several counties of the state; such inventory shall show in detail the cost of construction together with the depreciation charges incident thereto since construction, or may show the cost of replacement of such properties, if in the opinion of the commission the original cost and depreciation charges cannot be obtained: provided, that in the event any public utility refuses or neglects to file such inventory, or the inventory so filed is inaccurate, the commission may send its agents upon the ground and make an inventory as desired by the commission. The entire cost of making such inventory by the agents of the commission shall be paid by the public utility from its profit and loss account and shall not be charged to operating expenses, and such payment shall be made to the treasurer of the state, who shall deposit the same to the credit of the fund provided for the engineering department of said commission.

Every public utility shall file the inventory herein required within six (6) months after the approval of this section by the governor unless for just cause shown the commission may extend such time and shall file new, amended or supplemental inventories at such times thereafter as the commission may require.

§ 61-403. Blanks — Filling out by utility.

Every public utility receiving from the commission any blanks, with directions to fill the same, shall cause the same to be properly filled out so as to answer fully and correctly each question propounded therein; in case it is unable to answer any question, it shall give a good and sufficient reason for such failure.

§ 61-404. Copies of maps and records to be furnished.

Whenever required by the commission every public utility shall deliver to the commission copies of any and all maps, profiles, contracts, agreements, franchises, reports, books, accounts, papers and records in its possession or in any way relating to its property or affecting its business containing evidence relating to the merits of or pertinent to the hearing of any issue pending before the commission.

§ 61-405. Annual report.

Every public utility shall file an annual report with the commission, verified by the oath of an officer thereof. The verification shall be to the best of said official’s knowledge, information and belief. The commission shall prescribe the form of such report and the character of the information to be contained therein, and may from time to time make such changes and such additions in regard to the form and contents thereof as it may deem proper, and on or before January first in each year shall furnish a blank form for such annual reports to every public utility. The contents of such reports and the form thereof shall conform, as nearly as may be, in the case of public utility subject to an act of congress, entitled “An act to regulate commerce,” approved February 4, 1887, and the acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto, to that required by the interstate commerce commission; and the commission may also require the report to contain such additional information as is reasonably practicable for the public utility to furnish in relation to rates or regulations concerning fares, rates, agreements or contracts affecting the same, so far as such rates or regulations pertain to transportation within this state. In case it is unable to give such information, it shall give a good and sufficient reason for such failure. When the report of such corporation is defective, or believed to be erroneous, the commission shall notify the corporation or person to amend the same within the time prescribed by the commission. The originals of the reports subscribed to and sworn to as prescribed by law, shall be filed on or before the fifteenth day of April in each year and preserved in the office of the commission. The commission may extend the time for making and filing such report for a period not exceeding sixty (60) days.

Provided, that the commission may in its discretion, prescribe an abbreviated or modified form for such annual report, to be used by persons or corporations who operate or control any plant or system for distributing electric current but who do not generate such current, or by persons or corporations who operate on a small scale or serve a small community of persons.

§ 61-406. Compliance with commission’s orders.

Every public utility shall obey and comply with each and every requirement of every order, decision, direction, rule or regulation made or prescribed by the commission in the matters herein specified, and shall do everything necessary or proper in order to secure compliance with and observance of every such order, decision, direction, rule or regulation by all of its officers, agents and employees.